Rhode Island statutes. Title 40 Human Services
Chapter 5.3 Youth Pregnancy and At-Risk Prevention Services Program

40-5.3-1.
Short title.

This chapter is hereby entitled “Youth Pregnancy and At-Risk Prevention Services Program.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 437, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 467, § 1.

40-5.3-2.
Youth pregnancy and at-risk prevention services program — Findings — Legislative intent — Goals.

The legislature hereby finds and declares the following:

Young people, especially at-risk youth, are more vulnerable to teen pregnancy, child abuse, gang and drug-related activity, juvenile crime, school failure, neglect, and other illicit activities during the potentially unsupervised summer months, as well as the hours between the end of school and the time their parents or guardians return home from work.

Without community-based prevention and mentoring programs, the threats to the well-being and safety of our youth continue.

In order to minimize the risk to young people, it is the intent of the general assembly to expand after-school and summer community-based prevention, mentoring, and development programs and to implement those programs in accordance with the federal Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Program (“TANF” program) described in Title IV-A of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 601 et seq.

The goal of the program shall be to focus on the particular TANF goal of preventing youth pregnancies as well as reducing other at-risk behavior described in this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 437, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 467, § 1.

40-5.3-3.
Youth pregnancy and at-risk prevention services program — Establishment.

There is hereby established an after-school and summer youth prevention and development program to be administered by the department of human services. The establishment of the program pursuant to this chapter shall be contingent upon the availability and receipt of federal funding for the purpose set forth in §

40-5.3-2

. The department shall ensure that the goals of this chapter are met and that the state meets the federal requirements. The director of the department, to the extent that federal TANF funds are made available, may allocate to the program up to two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) annually.

In the event that there are changes in the federal TANF program, the department shall seek support through the general assembly to make all necessary changes and shall take all necessary steps to comply with the federal law.

Except as otherwise provided for herein, the director is responsible for implementation of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 437, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 467, § 1.

40-5.3-4.
Youth pregnancy and at-risk prevention services program — Eligibility requirements.

The Rhode Island Alliance of Boys and Girls Clubs is hereby authorized, on behalf of its member organizations, to make an application to the department for funding under this chapter.

The following requirements and conditions shall be necessary to establish eligibility for funding:

The organization must demonstrate that its members are affiliated and in good standing with a nationally chartered organization as described in Title 36, Subtitle II, Part B of the Patriotic and National Organizations, 36 U.S.C. § 311 et seq.;

The organization must provide tested and proven programs;

The organization must demonstrate that its members provide programs that are facility-based;

The organization must demonstrate that its members’ programs are offered for a minimum of ten (10) hours weekly during the school year and twenty (20) hours weekly during the summer;

The organization must demonstrate that its members’ programs exist in a minimum of seven (7) towns and cities within the state;

The organization must demonstrate that its members’ programs are administered in accordance with this chapter and designed to meet or exceed the minimum federal TANF guidelines;

The organization must demonstrate that it is eligible to receive federal TANF funding; and

The organization must be able to raise four dollars ($4) for every one dollar received from the state through federal funding.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 437, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 467, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 512, art. 1, § 27.

40-5.3-5.
Annual report to general assembly.

No later than March 1st of each year, the director shall submit a report to the general assembly showing how, within available resources, the department expects to operate the programs authorized under this chapter in the succeeding fiscal year. The director will provide an annual report of program impact on youth and indicators of success.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 437, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 467, § 1.

40-5.3-6.
Report to federal government.

The department shall make reports to the federal government, or any agency or department thereof, in the form and nature required by it, and shall in all respects comply with any request or direction of the federal government, or any agency or department thereof, that may be necessary to assure the correctness and verification of the reports.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 437, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 467, § 1.

40-5.3-7.
Rules and regulations.

The director of the department shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter. Any reference to the department’s rulemaking process is pursuant to this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 437, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 467, § 1.

40-5.3-8.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter, or the application thereof, to any person or circumstances is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 437, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 467, § 1.